Wisconsin, session 2025, SB933.
do enact as follows:SB933,11Section 1. 100.72 of the statutes is created to read:SB933,2,32100.72 Mental health warnings on social media platforms. (1) 3Definitions. In this section:SB933,2,94(a) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2., “social media platform” means an 5electronic medium, including a browser-based or application-based interactive 6computer service, website, telephone network, or data network, that allows an 7account holder to create, share, and view user-generated content for a substantial 8purpose of social interaction, sharing user-generated content, or personal 9networking.SB933,2,10102. “Social media platform” does not include any of the following:SB933,2,1111a. An Internet search provider.SB933,2,1212b. An Internet service provider.SB933,2,1313c. An email service.SB933,2,1714d. A streaming service, online video game, e-commerce platform, or other 15website on which the content is not user generated but that has interactive 16functions that enable chat, comments, reviews, or other interactive functionality 17incidental to, directly related to, and dependent upon providing the content.SB933,3,318e. A communication service, including text, audio, or video communication 1technology, provided by a business to the business’s employees and clients for use in 2the course of business activities and not for public distribution, except a 3communication service provided by a social media platform, as defined in subd. 1.SB933,3,54f. An advertising network with the sole function of delivering commercial 5content.SB933,3,66g. A telecommunications carrier, as defined in 47 USC 153 (51).SB933,3,77h. A broadband Internet access service, as defined in 47 CFR 8.1 (b).SB933,3,88i. A single-purpose community group for education or public safety.SB933,3,129j. A teleconferencing or video-conferencing service that allows reception and 10transmission of audio and video signals for real-time communication, except a 11teleconferencing or video-conferencing service provided by a social media platform, 12as defined in subd. 1.SB933,3,1413k. A cloud computing service, including a service providing cloud storage and 14shared document collaboration.SB933,3,1515L. Providing or obtaining technical support for a platform, product, or service.SB933,3,2016m. A platform designed primarily and specifically for creative professional 17users, as distinct from the general public, to share the creative professional user’s 18portfolio and creative content, engage in professional networking, acquire clients, 19and market the creative professional user’s creative content and creative services 20through facilitated transactions.SB933,3,2221(b) “User” means an individual who is located in this state and who holds an 22account or profile with a social media platform.SB933,4,323(2) Warning label required. (a) Subject to par. (c) 3. and sub. (3), a social 24media platform shall ensure that a conspicuous mental health warning label that 1complies with the requirements under this section appears each time a user 2accesses the social media platform and disappears only when the user does any of 3the following:SB933,4,441. Exits the social media platform.SB933,4,652. Acknowledges the potential for harm and chooses to proceed to the social 6media platform despite the risk.SB933,4,77(b) A mental health warning label under par. (a) shall do all of the following:SB933,4,1081. Warn the user, in a manner that conforms with the guidelines established 9under sub. (3), of potential negative mental health effects of accessing the social 10media platform.SB933,4,14112. Provide the user access to resources to address the potential negative 12mental health effects described in subd. 1. and include the website and telephone 13number of a national suicide prevention and mental health crisis hotline system, 14including the 988 suicide and crisis lifeline.SB933,4,1515(c) A social media platform may not do any of the following:SB933,4,17161. Display the warning label under par. (a) only in the social media platform’s 17terms and conditions.SB933,4,19182. Include extraneous information in the warning label under par. (a) that 19obscures the visibility or prominence of the warning label.SB933,4,21203. Allow a user to disable the warning label under par. (a), except as provided 21in par. (a) 2. or in the guidelines under sub. (3).SB933,4,23224. Display the warning label under par. (a) at times or for durations not 23specified in the guidelines under sub. (3).SB933,5,215. Use design features intended to undermine or subvert the purpose of this 2section.SB933,5,636. Withhold, degrade, lower the quality of, or increase the price of any product, 4service, or feature provided or offered to a user as a result of the social media 5platform’s display of a warning label under par. (a), except as necessary to comply 6with requirements under this section or other state or federal law.SB933,5,167(3) Content of warning label. The department, in consultation with the 8department of health services, shall develop social media platform guidelines that 9contain appropriate requirements for the warning labels required under sub. (2) (a). 10The guidelines shall be based on current evidence regarding the negative mental 11health effects of social media platforms. The guidelines shall include display 12requirements for the information required under sub. (2) (b) 2. The guidelines may 13allow users to disable the warning label under sub. (2) (a) and, if the guidelines do 14so, the guidelines shall specify the circumstances under which this is permitted. 15The department and department of health services shall periodically review and, 16as appropriate, revise the guidelines.SB933,5,1917(4) Enforcement, penalty, and private cause of action. (a) The 18department or the department of justice may investigate an alleged violation of this 19section.SB933,5,2220(b) The department or the department of justice may bring a civil action in the 21name of the state for a violation of this section and may obtain against a social 22media platform that violates this section any combination of the following relief:SB933,5,23231. A forfeiture not exceeding $5,000 for each violation.SB933,6,2242. Temporary or permanent injunctive relief enjoining or restraining any act 1or practice that is in violation of this section or otherwise enforcing compliance with 2this section.SB933,6,433. Restitution to any person who suffered loss as a direct or indirect result of 4the violation.SB933,6,654. Disgorgement of any money the social media platform received as a direct 6or indirect result of the violation.SB933,6,107(c) A person who directly or indirectly suffers injury as a result of a violation 8of this section may bring a civil action against the violating social media platform in 9which the court may award to the person if the person prevails any combination of 10the following relief:SB933,6,12111. Damages to the person directly or indirectly resulting from the violation, 12including physical and emotional harm.SB933,6,13132. Punitive damages if circumstances warrant.SB933,6,14143. Temporary or permanent injunctive relief.SB933,6,15154. Notwithstanding s. 814.04 (1), court costs and reasonable attorney fees.SB933,216Section 2. 227.01 (13) (zm) of the statutes is created to read:SB933,6,1717227.01 (13) (zm) Are guidelines issued under s. 100.72 (3). Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb933 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb933 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB933 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB933 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB933: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting